District of Columbia statutes.
31-4437

Repealed

Reinsurance by domestic companies in authorized companies.

Repealed.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1154, Ch. 672, ch. III, § 37
Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-36, § 6(a), 40 DCR 5812
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 26(c), 41 DCR 5193
1973 Ed., § 35-537.
1981 Ed., § 35-635.